Utah statutes.
72-12-106.   Employer's liability for ride-sharing injuries.
(1) An employer is not liable for injuries to passengers or other persons or
both resulting from the operation or use of a motor vehicle not owned, leased,
or contracted for by the employer in a ride-sharing arrangement.
(2)  An employer is not liable for injuries to passengers or other persons or
both on account of the employer having provided information or incentives or
otherwise having encouraged employees to participate in ride-sharing
arrangements.
